Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 190.19, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Uses; veterans. (a) Money appropriated to the Department of Veterans Affairs from the Minnesota "Support Our Troops" account may be used for: (1) grants to veterans service organizations; (2) outreach to underserved veterans; (3) providing services and programs for veterans and their families; (4) transfers to the driver and vehicle services operating account for Gold Star license plates under section 168.1253; (5) grants of up to $100,000 to any organization approved by the commissioner of veterans affairs for the purpose of supporting and improving the lives of veterans and their families; (6) grants to an eligible foundation; and (7) the agency's uncompensated burial costs for eligible dependents to whom the commissioner grants a no-fee deleted text begin or reduced-feedeleted text end burial in the state's veteran cemeteries pursuant to section 197.236, subdivision 9deleted text begin , paragraph (b)deleted text end . (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "eligible foundation" includes any organization that: (1) is a tax-exempt organization under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (2) is a nonprofit corporation under chapter 317A and the organization's articles of incorporation specify that a purpose of the organization includes: (i) providing assistance to veterans and their families; or (ii) enhancing the lives of veterans and their families. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 197.236, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Burial feesnew text begin prohibitednew text end . deleted text begin (a) The commissioner of veterans affairs shall establish a fee schedule, which may be adjusted from time to time, for the interment of eligible spouses and dependent children. The fees shall cover as nearly as practicable the actual costs of interment, excluding the value of the plot. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) Upon application, the commissioner may waive or reduce the burial fee for an indigent eligible person. The commissioner shall develop a policy, eligibility standards, and application form for requests to waive or reduce the burial fee to indigent eligible applicants. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end No plot or interment fees may be charged for the burial of deleted text begin service members who die on active duty or eligible veterans, as defined in United States Code, title 38, section 101, paragraph (2)deleted text end new text begin eligible persons under subdivision 8new text end . Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for the uncompensated burial costs for eligible dependents to whom the commissioner grants a no-fee burial in the state's veteran cemeteries pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 197.236, subdivision 9. new text end